Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-420
Legislative Fiscal Analyst; officer, board, commission, and department of state government; furnish information; request subpoena.

(1) Each officer, board, commission, and department of state government, including the Accounting Administrator of the Department of Administrative Services, shall furnish to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, upon request, any information in its possession, including records received from other officers, boards, commissions, or departments of state government, whether such information is retained in computer files or otherwise, if such information is directly related to the performance of the official duties of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst under sections 50-418 to 50-420.

(2) At the request of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, and after receiving prior approval by a majority vote of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature may issue subpoenas as provided in subsection (3) of section 50-406 for information related to a request from the Legislative Fiscal Analyst pursuant to this section.

Laws 1961, c. 253, § 3, p. 747;

Laws 1979, LB 193, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 81.